nursery/apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.gd.dix
    <pardef n="an-troma/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="caim/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="eadar-dheala/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="r/eul__n">
      <e><p><l>eul</l><r>eul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èil</l><r>eul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eultan</l><r>eul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eultan</l><r>eul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="an-tromaich"><i>an-troma</i><par n="an-troma/ich__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="caimich"><i>caim</i><par n="caim/ich__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eadar-dhealaich"><i>eadar-dheala</i><par n="eadar-dheala/ich__vblex"/></e>
